Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4315.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1308f. (1) The department of state police and the office of school safety within the department of state police, in coordination with the department and the department of attorney general, shall develop school safety and security training materials and best practices and provide annual training resources on all of the following topics, as applicable: (a) For school resource officers, both of the following: (i) Position-specific training that is in addition to any training received by the school resource officer to become a law enforcement officer. The materials, best practices, and training resources on the topics described in this subparagraph must be developed by the department of state police and the office of school safety within the department of state police. (ii) Coverage of legal updates to aid in an officer's understanding of the limits and scope of the officer's authority in the school environment. The materials, best practices, and training resources on the topics described in this subparagraph must be developed by the department of attorney general. (b) For members of a crisis response team described in section 1308b, all of the following developed by the department of state police and the office of school safety within the department of state police: (i) Target hardening. (ii) Familiarity with law enforcement response to school emergencies. (iii) Incident command systems. (c) For all school personnel of a public school or, subject to subsection (3), a nonpublic school who have regular contact with pupils, all of the following: (i) Mandatory threat reporting protocols, including how to report concerns, what is appropriate to report, and warning signs that may indicate that someone is at risk for potential harm to themselves or others. The materials, best practices, and training resources on the topics described in this subparagraph must be developed by the department. (ii) The confidential safety tip line process administered by the OK2Say program or a successor state program. As used in this subparagraph, "OK2Say program" means this state's student safety program that allows students to confidentially report tips on potential harm or criminal activities directed at students, school employees, and schools. The materials, best practices, and training resources on the topics described in this subparagraph must be developed by the department of state police and the office of school safety within the department of state police. (iii) Emergency operations plans and emergency response procedures. The materials, best practices, and training resources on the topics described in this subparagraph must be developed by the department of state police and the office of school safety within the department of state police. (d) For school safety and security personnel, the legal authority and limitations of security personnel who are not licensed under the Michigan commission on law enforcement standards act, 1965 PA 203, MCL 28.601 to 28.615. The materials, best practices, and training resources on the topics described in this subdivision must be developed by the department of attorney general. (2) Any materials, best practices, and training resources developed under subsection (1) must be provided to the department of state police and the office of school safety within the department of state police. The office of school safety within the department of state police shall make all materials, best practices, and training resources it receives publicly available on its website. (3) The governing body of a nonpublic school may elect to exempt the nonpublic school from the requirements of this section. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. 4222. (b) House Bill No. 4223.